Utah statutes.
63K-1-503.   Removal of designees.

Until the persons designated as emergency interim successors or special emergency judges succeed to the exercise of the powers and duties of an office, they shall serve as emergency interim successors or special emergency judges at the pleasure of the designating authority and may be removed and replaced by the designating authority at any time, with or without cause.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

